Utah statutes.
16-17-302.   Duties of registered agent.
The only duties under this chapter of a registered agent that has complied
with this chapter are:
(1)  to forward to the represented entity at the address most recently
supplied to the agent by the entity any process, notice, or demand that is
served on the agent;
(2)  to provide the notices required by this chapter to the entity at the
address most recently supplied to the agent by the entity;
(3)  if the agent is a noncommercial registered agent, to keep current the
information required by Subsection 16-17-203(1) in the most recent registered
agent filing for the entity; and
(4)  if the agent is a commercial registered agent, to keep current the
information listed for it under Subsection 16-17-204(1).
